Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 5

Movement of Single Family Residences

13-3-501. “Developed area of single family residences” defined.

As used in this part, “developed area of single family residences” means an area generally referred to as a subdivision as indicated on a plat filed in the register of deeds office.

Acts 2007, ch. 246, § 2.

13-3-502. Requirements for moving single family residence from one foundation to another.

No single family residence shall be moved from an existing foundation to another foundation located within a developed area of single family residences unless:

The residence to be moved is consistent with the age, value, size and appearance of existing residences within the developed area of single family residences to which the single family residence is to be moved; provided, that the value of the house may be greater than that of the existing residences and the size of the house may be larger than that of the existing residences; and

Approval for the movement of the single family residence to a foundation within a developed area of single family residences has been given by:

The home owners' association of the development where the residence is to be moved, if a home owners' association is in existence;

A neighborhood association where the residence is to be moved that has been in existence for more than one (1) year prior to the date the residence is to be moved, if a neighborhood association is in existence in the area;

The regional planning commission, if a regional planning commission is in existence in the area where the residence is to be moved, and subdivision (a)(2)(A) or (a)(2)(B) does not apply;

The municipal planning commission, if a municipal planning commission is in existence in the municipality where the residence is to be moved and subdivision (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(B) or (a)(2)(C) does not apply; or

The municipal or county legislative body in the jurisdiction where the residence is to be moved, and subdivision (a)(2)(A), (a)(2)(B), (a)(2)(C) or (a)(2)(D) does not apply.

As used in this section, “single family residence” does not include manufactured or modular homes as manufactured or modular homes are defined in § 47-9-102, § 55-1-105, or title 68, chapter 126.

Acts 2007, ch. 246, § 3; 2008, ch. 860, § 1.

13-3-503. Consistency of residence with age, value, size and appearance of existing residences.

The residence is consistent with:

The age of existing residences within the developed area of single family residences, if the residence to be moved is within ten (10) years of the average age of the existing structures within the developed area;

The value of existing residences within the developed area of single family residences, if the valuation of the residence being moved appraised, prior to being moved, at a value that is at least equal to the average appraisal of the existing structures within the developed area; provided, that nothing in this subdivision (2) shall be construed to prevent the residence from exceeding the value of the existing structures. In establishing the value of existing structures, the value of modular homes located in the developed area shall not be used in arriving at the average appraisal of the existing structures;

If the value of the residence, prior to being moved, appraised at a value that is at least equal to the average appraisal of the existing structures within the developed area, then it shall be presumed that the residence shall appraise at least at the same or greater value once it is moved;

In obtaining approval from a governing body identified in § 13-3-502, as proof that the value of the residence or appearance of the residence is consistent with the value or appearance of the existing residences, evidence may be presented that includes photographs of the inside and outside of the residence to be moved as well as the appraised value of the residence as determined by the assessor of property, or the fair market value of the residence as determined by an independent appraiser. The proof shall be a rebuttable presumption that the value and appearance of the residence is at least equal to the value and appearance of the existing structures within the developed area. Additional documents showing intended improvements may also be presented;

The size of existing residences within the developed area of single family residences, if the size of the residence being moved is at least within one hundred square feet (100 sq. ft.) of the average size of the existing structures within the developed area; provided, that nothing in this subdivision (3) shall be construed to prevent the residence from exceeding the average square footage. In establishing the average size of existing structures, the square footage of modular homes shall not be used in making the calculations; and

The appearance of existing residences within the developed area of single family residences as determined by the body giving its approval for the single family residence to be moved to the developed area.

Acts 2007, ch. 246, § 4; 2008, ch. 860, § 2.

13-3-504. Structural improvements — Timeframe requirements — Penalties.

All structural improvements that will affect the value and appearance of a residence moved to a developed area of single family residences shall be made to the residence within one (1) year of being moved into the area. If within one (1) year of that date, improvements have not been completed on the residence at least equal to the average standards in the developed area, the residence shall be deemed to be in violation of the local government building codes, and penalties associated with the violations may begin to accrue in accordance with all relevant local building codes and ordinances adopted and in effect in the local jurisdiction where the residence is located.

Acts 2008, ch. 860, § 3.